Florida, session 2026, SB1078.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 36 37 Section 1.âSection 14.059, Florida Statutes, is created to 38 read: 39 14.059âGubernatorial transition; coordination, access, and 40 agency obligations.â 41 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 42 (a)ââState agencyâ means an executive branch agency the 43 head of which is appointed solely by the Governor. 44 (b)ââTransition periodâ means the period beginning on the 45 day the Elections Canvassing Commission certifies the results of 46 a general election in a year in which the Governor is elected 47 and ending on the day the Governor-elect is inaugurated as 48 Governor. The term does not include any period following the 49 reelection of an incumbent Governor to a second consecutive 50 term. 51 (2)âNo later than the 10th day after the primary election, 52 the Governor shall designate a transition liaison within the 53 Executive Office of the Governor. The transition liaison shall: 54 (a)âServe as the primary point of contact between the 55 current administration and the Governor-elect and his or her 56 staff. 57 (b)âOversee and coordinate transition planning and 58 operations with state agencies. 59 (c)âCreate a transition directory that summarizes the 60 statutory authority, programs, functions, and organizational 61 structure of each state agency. The transition directory must be 62 delivered to the Governor-elect within 3 days after the 63 beginning of the transition period. 64 (d)âCreate and coordinate transition training, orientation, 65 and briefings for the Governor-elect and his or her staff which 66 cover: 67 1.âThe organizational structure of the executive branch of 68 state government. 69 2.âAdministrative processes of state agencies, including 70 personnel systems. 71 3.âPublic records and meeting requirements. 72 4.âEthics and financial disclosure laws. 73 5.âRulemaking procedures under the Administrative Procedure 74 Act. 75 6.âState budgeting and financial management processes. 76 7.âAny additional subject identified by the Governor-elect 77 and determined by the transition liaison to be reasonably 78 necessary to support an orderly transition between 79 administrations and the continuity of state agency operations. 80 (e)âEstablish instructions and guidance for agency 81 transition liaisons regarding the preparation, content, and 82 delivery of standardized briefing books under paragraph (3)(b). 83 (3)âNo later than the 10th day after the primary election, 84 the head of each state agency shall designate an agency 85 transition liaison. The agency transition liaison shall: 86 (a)âServe as the primary point of contact between the 87 agency and the transition liaison. 88 (b)âPrepare standardized briefing books in accordance with 89 instructions and guidance established by the transition liaison. 90 The briefing books shall be delivered to the Governor-elect 91 within 3 days after the beginning of the transition period and 92 shall: 93 1.âOutline the agencyâs organizational structure, mission, 94 programs, budget, major contracts, recently concluded and 95 pending litigation, and rulemaking activity. 96 2.âIdentify all agency leadership personnel, including the 97 chief of staff, general counsel, deputy chiefs of staff, deputy 98 secretaries, division directors, and bureau chiefs. 99 3.âInclude any information deemed necessary by the 100 transition liaison to support an orderly transition between 101 administrations and the continuity of state agency operations. 102 (4)(a)1.âThe Department of Management Services shall 103 provide the Governor-elect, his or her staff, and the 104 inauguration staff with temporary office facilities in the 105 Capitol Center during the transition period. 106 2.âEach state agency shall provide temporary office space 107 within the agency headquarters for use by the Governor-elect and 108 his or her staff during the transition period. 109 (b)1.âUpon request of the Governor-elect, the Department of 110 Management Services shall provide the Governor-elect and his or 111 her staff with information technology and related resources 112 necessary for transition operations during the transition 113 period. The Governor-elect must designate in writing each person 114 to be provided with information technology and related services. 115 At a minimum, information technology and related services 116 include: 117 a.âComputers and any necessary equipment for their use. 118 b.âSecure e-mail accounts. 119 c.âCybersecurity training and monitoring. 120 d.âTechnical assistance related to the use of the 121 information technology. 122 2.âBefore the Governor-elect or a designee of the Governor 123 elect is provided with information technology, he or she must 124 sign a memorandum of understanding acknowledging that he or she 125 will adhere to state cybersecurity practices and will return the 126 information technology to the department upon conclusion of the 127 transition period. 128 (5)(a)âUpon request and in coordination with the transition 129 liaison, each state agency shall provide the Governor-elect and 130 his or her staff with access to agency leadership personnel 131 during the transition period, including the chief of staff, 132 general counsel, deputy chiefs of staff, deputy secretaries, 133 division directors, and bureau chiefs. 134 (b)âEach state agency may assign limited personnel to 135 assist the Governor-elect and his or her staff during the 136 transition period to the extent consistent with the agencyâs 137 operational needs. 138 (6)(a)âDuring the transition period, the Governor-elect and 139 his or her staff shall be granted access to all state agency 140 records upon request. 141 (b)1.âDuring the transition period, the Governor-elect and 142 persons designated by the Governor-elect shall be granted access 143 to records that are confidential or exempt from s. 119.07(1) or 144 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. The Governor-elect 145 must designate in writing each person who must be granted access 146 to such records. No more than one person per temporary office 147 provided pursuant to paragraph (4)(a) may be designated by the 148 Governor-elect under this paragraph. 149 2.âBefore accessing any confidential or exempt records, the 150 Governor-elect and his or her designees must sign a memorandum 151 of understanding acknowledging that: 152 a.âSuch records will remain confidential or exempt. 153 b.âDisclosure of such records or the information contained 154 therein is prohibited unless specifically authorized by law. 155 c.âAll records will be returned to the custodian at the 156 conclusion of the transition period. 157 d.âThe Governor-elect and his or her designees may not 158 disclose or use confidential or exempt information for their 159 personal gain or benefit or for the personal gain or benefit of 160 any other person or business entity. 161 e.âA violation of sub-subparagraphs a. through d. is a 162 crime punishable as a felony of the third degree. 163 3.âAny person who willfully and knowingly violates this 164 paragraph commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 165 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 166 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 14.057, Florida 167 Statutes, is amended to read: 168 14.057âGovernor-elect; establishment of operating fund.â 169 (2)âThe Department of Management Services shall provide for 170 the Governor-elect, the Governor-electâs staff, and the 171 inauguration staff temporary office facilities in the capitol 172 center for the period extending from the day of the 173 certification of the Governor-electâs election by the Elections 174 Canvassing Commission to the day of his or her inauguration. 175 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.